it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Articoli per verniciatura: Aerografi; Pennelli da pittura; Accessori per dipingere i bordi; Rulli per vernici; Miscelatori per vernice; Spugne per vernici; Spruzzatori vernici; Filtri per vernice; Vassoi per vernici
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Ferramentas para pintura: Aerógrafos; Pincéis para tinta; Rolos de cantos; Rolos de pintura; Misturadores de tinta; Esponjas de pintura; Pulverizadores de pintura; Coadores de tinta; Bandejas para pintura
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Boya Aletleri: Havalı Boya Tabancaları; Boya Fırçaları; Boya Kenar Fırçaları; Boya Ruloları; Boya Çalkalayıcılar; Boya Süngerleri; Boya Tabancaları; Boya Süzgeçleri; Boya Paletleri
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Maleverktøy: Airbrusher; Malepensler; Kantpensler; Maleruller; Maleristere; Malesvamper; Malesprøyter; Malesiler; Malebrett
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 油漆工具: 噴筆; 油漆刷; 邊緣漆片; 油漆滾筒; 塗料混合機; 油漆用海綿; 噴漆槍; 濾漆篩; 漆盤
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Målarverktyg: Sprayflaskor; Målarpenslar; Målardynor; Rollers; Färgskakare; Målarsvampar; Färgsprutor; Färgsilar; Färgtråg
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Malerwerkzeug: Airbrushpistolen; Malerpinsel; Kantenmaler; Farbrollen; Farbrüttler; Malschwämme; Farbspritzpistolen; Farbsiebe; Farbwannen
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Festőeszközök: Festékszórók; Festőecsetek; Festékperemek; Festőhengerek; Festékrázók; Festékszivacsok; Festékpermetezők; Festékszűrők; Festéktálcák
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Nástroje na maľovanie: Rozprašovacie pištole; Maliarske štetce; Nástroje na maľovanie okrajov; Maliarske valčeky; Šejkery na miešanie farby; Maliarske špongie; Mariarske striekacie pištole; Maliarske sitká; Maliarske vaničky
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Maleredskaber: Luftpensler; Malepensler; Kantpensler; Maleruller; Malingsblandere; Malesvampe; Spraymaling; Siposer til maling; Malebakker
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Инструменти за боядисване: Аерографи; Четки за боядисване; Инструмент за отсичане на ъгли; Бояджийски валяци; Уреди за смесване на бои; Бояджийски гъби; Пистолети за боядисване; Цедки за боя; Вани за боя
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente pentru vopsit: Aerografe; Pensule pentru vopsit; Pensule pentru margini; Trafaleți; Dispozitive pentru amestecat vopseaua; Bureți pentru vopsea; Pulverizatoare pentru vopsea; Strecurători pentru vopsea; Tăvi pentru vopsea
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Alati za bojanje: Pištolji za raspršivanje boje; Kistovi za boju; Alati za bojanje kutova; Valjci za bojanje; Vibracijske miješalice za boju; Spužve za boju; Raspršivači za boje; Cjedila za boju; Kadice za boje
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Verfbenodigdheden: Verfsprays; Verfkwasten; Verfmaterialen voor het verven van hoeken; Verfrollers; Verfschudders; Verfsponzen; Verfspuiten; Verfzeven; Verfbakjes
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือทาสี: แปรงพ่นสี; แปรงทาสี; ที่ทำสีขอบ; ลูกกลิ้งสี; เครื่องเขย่าสี; ฟองน้ำทาสี; สเปรย์พ่นสี; ที่กรองสี; ถาดสี
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 페인트 공구: 에어브러시; 페인트 붓; 가장자리 페인팅 도구; 페인트 롤러; 페인트 셰이커; 페인트 스펀지; 페인트 분무기; 페인트 거름망; 페인트 트레이
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Herramientas de pintura: Aerógrafos; Brochas de pintura; Rodillos para esquinas; Rodillos; Agitadoras de pinturas; Esponjas; Pulverizadores de pintura; Coladores de pintura; Bandejas de pintura
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Малярные инструменты: Аэрографы; Малярные кисти; Инструменты для окрашивания углов и краев; Малярные валики; Шейкеры для краски; Малярные губки; Краскопульты; Фильтры для краски; Поддоны для краски
en: Hardware > Tools > Paint Tools: Airbrushes; Paint Brushes; Paint Edgers; Paint Rollers; Paint Shakers; Paint Sponges; Paint Sprayers; Paint Strainers; Paint Trays
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ sơn: Bình bơm phun; Chổi sơn; Dụng cụ bào sơn; Con lăn sơn; Máy lắc sơn; Cọ vẽ; Máy phun sơn; Lưới lọc sơn; Khay đựng sơn
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία βαφής: Αερογράφοι; Πινέλα ζωγραφικής; Εργασίες βαφής περιγράμματος; Ρολά βαφής; Αναδευτήρες βαφής; Σφουγγάρια βαφής; Ψεκαστήρες βαφής; Διηθητήρια βαφής; Δίσκοι βαφής
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Malířské nástroje: Stříkací pistole pro airbrush; Malířské štětce; Linkovací strojky; Malířské válečky; Stroje na míchání barev; Malířské houby; Stříkací pistole; Malířská sítka; Nádoby na barvu
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de peinture: Aérographes; Pinceaux; Rouleaux à peinture spécial contours; Rouleaux à peinture; Mélangeurs de peinture; Éponges à peinture; Pistolets à peinture; Tamis de peinture; Bacs à peinture
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Dažymo įrankiai: Aerografai; Dažų teptukai; Kraštų dažymo įrankiai; Dažymo voleliai; Dažų purtyklės; Dažų kempinės; Dažų purkštuvai; Dažų koštuvai; Dažymo padėklai
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas de pintura: Aerógrafos; Pincéis/trinchas de pintura; Acessórios de pintura de cantos; Rolos de pintura; Agitadores de tinta; Esponjas de pintura; Pulverizadores de pintura; Filtros de pintura; Tabuleiros de pintura
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia malarskie: Aerografy; Pędzle do malowania; Wałki do malowania rogów; Wałki malarskie; Mieszalniki farb; Gąbki malarskie; Pistolety natryskowe; Sitka do farb; Tacki malarskie
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 涂刷工具: 喷笔; 漆刷; 油漆/涂料修边器; 滚漆筒; 油漆搅拌器; 绘画海绵; 喷漆工具; 滤漆筛; 油漆托盘/涂料托盘/颜料盘
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Orodja za barvanje: Razpršilci barve; Čopiči za pleskanje; Orodja za barvanje robov; Pleskarski valjčki; Stresalniki za barvo; Gobice za nanos barve; Pršilniki barve; Cedila za barve; Posode za barvo
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Maalaustyökalut: Airbrush-ruiskut; Pensselit; Rajaajat; Maalitelat; Maalinsekoittajat; Maalisienet; Maalisuihkeet; Maalisiivilät; Maalikaukalot
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 塗装用品: エアブラシ; ペイントブラシ; ペイントエッジャー; ペイントローラー; ペイントシェーカー; ペイントスポンジ; スプレーガン; ペイントストレーナー; ペイントローラー受け皿